Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 1. Seeds.
§ 3.2-4016.
Exemptions from certain provisions.

The provisions of §§

3.2-4008

and

3.2-4015

and subdivision 6 of §

3.2-4001

shall not apply to:

Seed or grain sold or represented to be sold for purposes other than for planting, except as required by subsection F of §

3.2-4008

;

Seed for conditioning when: (i) consigned to, being transported to, or stored in a processing establishment; and (ii) the accompanying invoice or labeling bears the statement “Seed for conditioning”;

Any carrier of seed or screenings in the ordinary course of business provided that the carrier does not also produce, condition, or market agricultural, vegetable, flower, tree and shrub, lawn and turf seeds, or screenings; and

Untested seed sold on his own premises by a grower who collected gross receipts for selling seeds produced by him of $1,000 or less during the preceding year provided that the seed bears the statement “These seeds have not been tested” on each package or bag.

The provisions of §

3.2-4009

shall not apply to any person who sells or offers for sale:

Any lawn and turf seed mixture provided he: (i) acted in good faith; and (ii) possessed a statement showing that the lawn and turf seed mixture has been previously registered and approved for sale;

Any agricultural, vegetable, flower, tree and shrub, lawn and turf seeds, or screenings that are incorrectly labeled or represented as to kind, variety, or origin and cannot be identified by official examination unless he fails to: (i) obtain an invoice or grower’s declaration or other labeling information; or (ii) take other reasonable precautions to insure the identity is that stated; and

Any tree or shrub seeds that are incorrectly labeled or represented as to subspecies, locality of collection, or year of collection unless he fails to: (i) obtain an invoice, grower’s declaration, or other labeling information; or (ii) take other reasonable precautions to insure the accuracy of these statements as presented on the label.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-219.6; 1958, c. 483; 1966, cc. 9, 702, § 3.1-267; 1994, c. 577; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4017.
Disclaimers, nonwarranties, and limited warranties.

No disclaimer, nonwarranty, or limited warranty used in any invoice, advertising, labeling, nor any other written, printed or graphic matter pertaining to seed may deny or modify any information required by this article or regulations adopted hereunder.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-219.7; 1958, c. 483; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-268; 1994, c. 577; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4018.
Notice of violations; warning.

The Commissioner shall notify the custodian of any seed or screenings in violation of this article. The Commissioner shall forward a copy of notice to the guarantor.

Nothing in this article requires that the Commissioner report for prosecution or institute seizure proceedings if the Commissioner considers the violation of the law to be minor. In such cases, the Commissioner may provide a notice of warning in writing.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-219.12; 1958, c. 483; 1966, cc. 9, 702, § 3.1-274; 1994, c. 577; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4019.
Duty of attorney for Commonwealth.

It shall be the duty of each attorney for the Commonwealth to whom any violation of this article is reported to commence proceedings in the appropriate court without delay.

History.

1994, c. 577, § 3.1-275.6; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-4020.
Penalty.

Any violation of this article is a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 3-219.11; 1958, c. 483; 1966, c. 702, § 3.1-273; 1994, c. 577; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.